Washington statutes.
RCW 19.120.060

Refiner-suppliers—Prohibited conduct.

Notwithstanding the terms of any motor fuel franchise, no motor fuel refiner-supplier may:

(1) Require any motor fuel retailer to meet mandatory minimum sales volume requirements for fuel or other products unless the refiner-supplier proves that its price to the motor fuel retailer has been sufficiently low to enable the motor fuel retailer reasonably to meet the mandatory minimum;

(2) Alter, or require the motor fuel retailer to consent to the alteration of, any provision of the motor fuel franchise during its effective term without mutual consent of the motor fuel retailer;

(3) Interfere with any motor fuel retailer's right to assistance of counsel on any matter or to join or be active in any trade association; and

(4) Set or compel, directly or indirectly, the retail price at which the motor fuel retailer sells motor fuel or other products to the public.

[ 1986 c 320 s 7.]